Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,111
Flood control improvement corridor; map; filing, recording, and indexing required.

The district shall file a copy of each adopted or amended flood control improvement corridor map, together with a copy of the board resolution adopting or amending such map and containing the legal descriptions of all parcels of land traversed, with the county, city, or village officer responsible for the receipt of requests for the issuance of building permits for each county, city, and village traversed by the flood control improvement corridors depicted upon the map. The district shall also record each adopted or amended flood control improvement corridor map and each board resolution adopting or amending such map with the register of deeds of each county traversed by such corridors. A notice of the existence of the map and board resolution shall be indexed against all parcels of land included in whole or in part on such map and, in addition, shall indicate to the landowner where the map may be reviewed.

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 18.